Utah statutes.
62A-5-315.   Petition for reexamination.

(1)  A resident committed under Section 62A-5-312, or his parent, spouse, legal guardian, relative, or attorney, may file a petition for reexamination with the district court of the county in which the resident is domiciled or detained.

(2)  Upon receipt of that petition, the court shall conduct proceedings under Section 62A-5-312.

